de: Eckenverstellsystem des Cajóns: Eckschrauben (einstellbar); Feste Ecken; Sonstige
nb: Cajon hjørnekontrollsystem: Hjørneskruer (justerbare); Faste hjørner; Annet
pl: System kontroli narożników cajónu: Śruby narożne (regulowane); Stałe narożniki; Inne
sk-SK: Systém kontroly rohov cajónov: Rohové skrutky (nastaviteľné); Pevné rohy; Iné
hr-HR: Sustav za kontrolu kutova Cajona: Kutni vijci (prilagodljivi); Fiksni kutovi; Ostalo
ko: 카혼 코너 제어 시스템: 코너 나사(조정 가능); 고정형 코너; 기타
en: Cajon corner control system: Corner screws (adjustable); Fixed corners; Other
th: ระบบควบคุมเสียงมุมกล่องคาฮอง: สกรูมุม (ปรับได้); มุมตายตัว; อื่นๆ
es: Sistema de control de esquinas del cajón: Tornillos de esquina (ajustables); Esquinas fijas; Otro
sv: Cajon hörnkontrollsystem: Hörnskruvar (justerbara); Fasta hörn; Övrigt
ja: カホンコーナー制御システム: コーナースクリュー (調整可能); 固定コーナー; その他
cs: Systém ovládání rohů cajonu: Rohové šrouby (nastavitelné); Pevné rohy; Jiný
ru: Система регулировки углов кахона: Угловые винты (регулируемые); Фиксированные углы; Другое
el: Σύστημα ελέγχου γωνίας Cajon: Γωνιακές βίδες (ρυθμιζόμενες); Σταθερές γωνίες; Άλλο
pt-BR: Sistema de controle de cantos do cajon: Parafusos de canto (ajustáveis); Cantos fixos; Outro
nl: Cajon hoekregelsysteem: Hoekschroeven (verstelbaar); Vaste hoeken; Overig
hu: Cajon sarokvezérlő rendszer: Sarokcsavarok (állítható); Rögzített sarkok; Egyéb
it: sistema di controllo angolare Cajon: Viti angolari (regolabili); Angoli fissi; Altro
zh-CN: 卡洪鼓边角调节系统: 边角螺丝（可调）; 固定边角; 其他
tr: Cajon köşe kontrol sistemi: Köşe vidaları (ayarlanabilir); Sabit köşeler; Diğer
fi: Cajonin kulman säätömekanismi: Kulmaruuvit (säädettävä); Kiinteät kulmat; Muu
sl-SI: Sistem za nadzorovanje kotov cajona: Kotni vijaki (prilagodljivi); Fiksni koti; Drugo
lt-LT: Cajon kampų valdymo sistema: Kampiniai varžtai (reguliuojami); Fiksuoti kampai; Kita
ro-RO: Sistem de control al colțurilor cajonului: Șuruburi de colț (ajustabile); Colțuri fixe; Altele
vi: Hệ thống điều chỉnh âm thanh góc Cajon: Ốc vít góc (có thể điều chỉnh); Góc cố định; Khác
zh-TW: 木箱鼓角落控制系統: 角落螺絲 (可調); 固定角落; 其他
fr: Système de réglage des angles du cajón: Vis d’angle (réglables); Angles fixes; Autre
da: Cajon-hjørnekontrolsystem: Hjørneskruer (justerbare); Faste hjørner; Andet
pt-PT: Sistema de controlo de canto do cajon: Parafusos de canto (ajustáveis); Cantos fixos; Outro
bg-BG: Система за контрол на ъглите на кахона: Винтове на ъглите (регулируеми); Фиксирани ъгли; Други